Utah statutes.
54-9-108.   Scope -- Ownership or use of works or facilities.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed as imposing on an interlocal entity, as defined in Section 11-13-101, created on or before January 1, 1981, under Laws of Utah 1977, Chapter 47, Section 3, as amended, or in an agreement to which an interlocal entity is a party, any duty, requirement, or restriction other than those imposed by Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(2)  For purposes of this chapter, a person does not own or use works or facilities if the person is a party to a power sales contract to purchase output generated by, the capacity of, or an entitlement in the works or facilities.



Enacted by Chapter 345, 2012 General Session

